Massachusetts, session 194th, H3374.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 30B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof 
the following subsection:- 
(a) Except as permitted pursuant to this section and section 7, for the procurement of a 
supply or service for a governmental body in the amount of $10,000 or greater, but not more than 
$50,000, a procurement officer shall seek written quotations from no fewer than 3 persons 
customarily providing the supply or service; provided, however, that for the procurement of a 
supply or service for a municipal or regional school district such amount shall be $10,000 or 
greater, but not more than $100,000. The procurement officer shall record: (1) the names and 
addresses of all person from whom quotations were sought, (2) the purchase description used for 

of 3 11 the procurement, (3) the names of the persons submitting quotations and (4) the date and amount 
of each quotation. Such information shall be retained in the file required pursuant to section 3. A 
governmental body may require that any procurement for a governmental body in an amount of 
not more than $50,000 be subject to section 5 or section 6; provided, however, that any 
procurement for a municipal or regional school district such amount shall be not more than 
$100,000. 
SECTION 2. Section 4 of chapter 30B of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 
(b) The procurement officer shall award the contract to the responsible person offering 
the needed quality of supply or service at the lowest quotation unless the procurement officer 
elected to procure the supply or service subject to section 6. If the supply or service was procured 
subject to section 6, the procurement officer shall award the contract pursuant to section 6 
subsection (g). 
SECTION 3. Section 6 of said Chapter 30B is hereby amended in paragraph (a) by 
inserting after the figure “$50,000” the following words: “except as permitted pursuant to section 
4 subsection (a),” 
SECTION 4. Section 22 of said Chapter 30B is hereby amended by striking out Section 
22 in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following section:- Section 22. A public 
procurement unit may participate in, sponsor, conduct or administer a cooperative purchasing 
agreement for the procurement of supplies and services bid in accordance with Massachusetts 
General Law Chapter 30B with public procurement units or external procurement activities in 
accordance with an agreement entered into between the participants. The public procurement 

of 3 33 unit conducting the procurement of supplies and services shall do so in a manner that constitutes 
a full and open competition.